Nevada, session 83, SB39.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 414 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Account” means the Nevada Hazard Mitigation
Revolving Loan Account created by section 8 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Division” means the Division of Emergency
Management of the Office of the Military.
Sec. 5. “Eligible recipient” means:
1. A local government; or
2. A tribal government.
Sec. 6. “Hazard mitigation project” means any hazard
mitigation project of an eligible recipient that qualifies pursuant to
the STORM Act for financial assistance in the form of a loan of
money from the Account.
Sec. 7. “STORM Act” means the federal Safeguarding
Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 5135.
Sec. 8. 1. The Nevada Hazard Mitigation Revolving Loan
Account is hereby created in the State General Fund as a
revolving loan account. The Account must be administered by the
Division.
2. The Account consists of:
(a) Capitalization grants received from the Federal Emergency
Management Agency pursuant to the STORM Act;
(b) Money appropriated by the Legislature to satisfy any
matching funding, as required by the STORM Act;
(c) Money from the repayment of any loan made by Division
from the Account to an eligible recipient; and
(d) Interest and income earned on the money in the Account.
3. All interest and income earned on the money in the
Account must be credited to the Account.
4. Any money in the Account at the end of a fiscal year does
not revert to the State General Fund and the balance in the
Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 9. 1. The Division shall develop and carry out a
program for an eligible recipient to apply for a loan from the
Account for the purpose of financing a hazard mitigation project.
Any loan of money from the Account to an eligible recipient must
be made in compliance with any applicable requirement set forth
in the STORM Act.
2. In carrying out the program, the Division shall:
(a) Prioritize approving loans for hazard mitigation projects
that the Division determines will have the greatest impact on
mitigating hazards in this State; and
(b) Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law, require as a
condition of a loan of money from the Account to fund all or part
of the costs of a hazard mitigation project, an eligible entity to
comply with the provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive,
and the competitive bidding requirements of chapter 338 of NRS.
3. The Division may provide technical assistance to eligible
recipients in applying for and administering loans from the
Account.
Sec. 10. Any loan of money from the Account must not be
used to replace or supplant any other money available to an
eligible recipient for hazard mitigation.
Sec. 11. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of sections 2 to 11, inclusive, of this act. The
regulations must include, without limitation:
1. The procedures by which an eligible recipient may apply
for a loan from the Account; and
2. The criteria for an eligible recipient to receive a loan from
the Account, including, without limitation, a requirement for the
eligible recipient to demonstrate:
(a) The need for the loan;
(b) The ability of the eligible recipient to repay the loan over a
fixed term; and
(c) That the eligible recipient has the technical, managerial
and financial ability to comply with any applicable requirement of
the STORM Act.
Sec. 12. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)